Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Judgments.

Collateral references. —

46 Am. Jur. 2d, Judgments, § 1 et seq.

49 C.J.S., Judgments, § 1 et seq. 50 C.J.S. 710.

Date of verdict or date of entry of judgment thereon as beginning of interest period on judgment, 1 ALR2d 479.

Decree or judgment subject to direct attack in chain of title as rendering title unmerchantable, 9 ALR2d 710.

Necessity of notice of application or intention to correct error in judgment entry, 14 ALR2d 224.

Entry of final judgment after disagreement of jury, 31 ALR2d 885.

Part payment or promise to pay judgment as affecting time for revival, 45 ALR2d 967.

Effect of verdict “for plaintiff” in action against multiple defendants, 47 ALR2d 803.

Reviving, renewing, or extending judgments by order entered after expiration of statutory limitation period on motion made or proceeding commenced within such period, 52 ALR2d 672.

Judgment ambiguous or silent as to amount of recovery as defective for lack of certainty, 55 ALR2d 723.

Court’s power to increase amount of verdict or judgment over either party’s refusal or failure to consent to addition, 56 ALR2d 213.

Mere rendition of formal entry or docketing, of judgment as prerequisite to issuance of valid execution thereon, 65 ALR2d 1162.

Conduct of parties as curing formal defects of judgment or order as regards appealability, 73 ALR2d 278.

Reviewability of void judgment by writ of error or by appeal, 81 ALR2d 557.

Validity of court’s judgment rendered on Sunday or holiday, 85 ALR2d 595.

Power of trial court to enjoin enforcement of its judgment as affected by previous affirmance, 85 ALR2d 772.

Use of judgment in prior juvenile court proceeding to impeach credibility of witness, 63 ALR3d 1112.

Power of successor or substituted master or referee to render decision or enter judgment on testimony heard by predecessor, 70 ALR3d 1079.

Contempt for violation of compromise and settlement the terms of which were approved by court but not incorporated into court order, decree, or judgment, 84 ALR3d 1047.

Judgment in death action as precluding subsequent personal injury action by potential beneficiary of death action, or vice versa, 94 ALR3d 676.

Appealability of state court’s order or decree compelling or refusing to compel arbitration, 6 ALR4th 652.

Sec. 09.30.010.
Recording copy of judgment as lien.

A certified copy of the judgment or decree of a court of this state or a court of record of the United States upon which execution may issue, the enforcement of which has not been stayed, may be recorded with the recorder of a recording district.
From the recording, the judgment or decree becomes a lien upon the real property of the defendant that is in the recording district, that is not exempt from execution, and that is owned by the defendant at the time or acquired by the defendant afterward but before the lien expires.
The lien continues during the time execution may issue on the judgment or decree but for not more than 10 years from date of entry of the judgment or decree. After expiration of the lien, the court may grant leave for issuance of execution upon the judgment or decree.
From the date of recording the judgment or decree, together with the order allowing issuance of execution, the judgment or decree becomes a lien in the manner provided in this section.

History.

(§ 4.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For entry of judgment, see Civ.
R. 58; for execution, see Civ.
R. 69.

Sec. 09.30.020.
Priority of lien of judgment.

A conveyance of real property or interest in real property is void against a judgment lien that is recorded before the conveyance is recorded.

History.

(§ 4.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1964)

Cross references. —

For effect of recording generally, see AS

40.17.080

.

Sec. 09.30.030.
Judgment where summons not served on all defendants.

When an action is against two or more defendants jointly indebted upon a contract and the summons is served on one or more but not all of them and judgment is recovered, it may be entered against all the defendants jointly indebted only so far as it may be enforced against the joint property of all and the separate property of the defendants served and, if they are subject to arrest, against the persons of the defendants served.

History.

(§ 4.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.30.040.
Judgments against boroughs and cities.

Where judgment is against a borough, city, or other public corporation, no execution may issue on it but the judgment may be satisfied only as follows:

the party in whose favor the judgment is given may, at any time within 10 years of the date of the judgment, present a certified copy of the judgment to the officer of the borough, city, or other public corporation authorized to draw orders on its treasurer;

upon presentation, the officer shall draw an order on the treasurer for the amount of the judgment in favor of the party for whom the judgment was given; after that the order may be presented for payment and paid in the manner and with the effect of other orders upon the treasurer of a borough, city, or other public corporation.

History.

(§ 4.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.30.050.
Confession of judgment.

A judgment by confession may be entered with or without action against a person for any amount or relief.
The confession may be made only by the confessor in person or by the person’s attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney so authorizing, or, if the confessor is a corporation, only by a person who at that time has a relation to the corporation that would authorize the service of summons on that person.

History.

(§ 4.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, under AS

01.05.031(b)

, the revisor of statutes substituted “attorney-in-fact” for “attorney in fact” in this section.

Cross references. —

For related court rules, see Civ.
R. 57(b) and (c).

Sec. 09.30.055.
[Renumbered as AS 09.30.065.]

Sec. 09.30.060.
Confession of judgment against jointly liable defendant.

When an action upon a contract is pending against one or more defendants jointly liable, judgment may be given on the confession of one or more defendants against all the defendants jointly liable, whether all defendants have been served with the summons or not.
However, the judgment may be enforced only against their joint property and against the joint and separate property of the defendant making the confession.

History.

(§ 4.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related court rules, see Civ. R. 57(b) and (c) and 69.

Sec. 09.30.065.
Offers of judgment.

At any time more than 10 days before the trial begins, either the party making a claim or the party defending against a claim may serve upon the adverse party an offer to allow judgment to be entered in complete satisfaction of the claim for the money or property or to the effect specified in the offer, with costs then accrued. If within 10 days after the service of the offer the adverse party serves written notice that the offer is accepted, either party may then file the offer and notice of acceptance together with proof of service, and the clerk shall enter judgment. An offer not accepted within 10 days is considered withdrawn, and evidence of that offer is not admissible except in a proceeding to determine the form of judgment after verdict. If the judgment finally entered on the claim as to which an offer has been made under this section is at least five percent less favorable to the offeree than the offer, or if there are multiple defendants at least 10 percent less favorable to the offeree than the offer, the offeree, whether the party making the claim or defending against the claim, shall pay all costs as allowed under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure and shall pay reasonable actual attorney fees incurred by the offeror from the date the offer was made, as follows:

if the offer was served no later than 60 days after both parties made the disclosures required by the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, the offeree shall pay 75 percent of the offeror’s reasonable actual attorney fees;

if the offer was served more than 60 days after both parties made the disclosures required by the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure but more than 90 days before the trial began, the offeree shall pay 50 percent of the offeror’s reasonable actual attorney fees;

if the offer was served 90 days or less but more than 10 days before the trial began, the offeree shall pay 30 percent of the offeror’s reasonable actual attorney fees.

If an offeror receives costs and reasonable actual attorney fees under (a) of this section, that offeror shall be considered the prevailing party for purposes of an award of attorney fees under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if the amount awarded an offeror for attorney fees under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure is greater than a party would receive under (a) of this section, the offeree shall pay to the offeror attorney fees specified under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure and is not required to pay reasonable actual attorney fees under (a) of this section. A party who receives attorney fees under this section may not also receive attorney fees under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

(§ 3 ch 107 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.30.055

. Renumbered in 1983.
Originally enacted as
AS 45.45.010(i) and renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For related court rule, see Civ.
R. 68.

For provisions relating to the effect of the 1997 amendments to subsection (a) and addition of (b) on Rules 68 and 82, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 52, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 139, SLA 1986 provides that the 1986 amendment to this section applies “to all causes of action accruing after June 11, 1986.”

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.30.070.
Interest on judgments; prejudgment interest.

Notwithstanding AS

45.45.010

, the rate of interest on judgments and decrees for the payment of money, including prejudgment interest, is three percentage points above the 12th Federal Reserve District discount rate in effect on January 2 of the year in which the judgment or decree is entered, except that a judgment or decree founded on a contract in writing, providing for the payment of interest until paid at a specified rate not exceeding the legal rate of interest for that type of contract, bears interest at the rate specified in the contract if the interest rate is set out in the judgment or decree.

Except when the court finds that the parties have agreed otherwise and except as provided by AS

45.05.111(d)

, prejudgment interest accrues from the day process is served on the defendant or the day the defendant received written notification that an injury has occurred and that a claim may be brought against the defendant for that injury, whichever is earlier. The written notification must be of a nature that would lead a prudent person to believe that a claim will be made against the person receiving the notification, for personal injury, death, or damage to property.

Prejudgment interest may not be awarded for future economic damages, future noneconomic damages, or punitive damages.

History.

(§ 4.07 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 139 SLA 1986; am §§ 18, 19 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For provisions requiring judgment against the state to include legal interest, see AS

09.50.280

. For legal rate of interest, see AS

45.45.010

. For provisions relating to the effect of 1997 addition of (c) to Rule 58, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 53, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For transitional provisions relating to the applicability of the 1999 amendment of subsection (b), see § 26, ch. 75, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 4, ch. 107, SLA 1980, the interest rate provided in this section applies only to judgments entered after July 1, 1980.

Section 5, ch. 107, SLA 1980 provides: “This Act does not amend Rule 68 of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.”

Section 9, ch. 139, SLA 1986 provides that the 1986 amendment to this section applies “to all causes of action accruing after June 11, 1986.”

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Environmental Conservation is permitted to recover lost potential earnings on monies expended to contain and clean up a release of oil or a hazardous substance.
To establish the recoverable cost, DEC may use the prejudgment interest formula in this section, and may base the formula rate on the appropriate discount rate on either January 2 of each calendar year or July 1 of each fiscal year for which the cost is owed.
The date upon which interest begins to accrue should be the date on which DEC provides notice to the responsible party that identifies the expenditure and requests payment. October 6, 1999 Op. Atty. Gen.